dictionaries/he_IL/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX 386 Y 1
SFX 386 0 רתכם .
SFX 385 Y 1
SFX 385 0 רתכן .
SFX 4452 Y 1
SFX 4452 0 יוניי .
SFX 4094 Y 1
SFX 4094 0 ודינו .
SFX 4683 Y 1
SFX 4683 0 ענוכם .
SFX 4682 Y 1
SFX 4682 0 ענוכן .
SFX 2538 Y 1
SFX 2538 0 עוכם .
SFX 2537 Y 1
SFX 2537 0 עוכן .
SFX 2204 Y 1
SFX 2204 0 יסטיות .
SFX 1180 Y 1
SFX 1180 0 ונות .
SFX 1785 Y 1
SFX 1785 0 איות .
SFX 4933 Y 1
SFX 4933 0 חד .
SFX 305 Y 1
SFX 305 0 חה .
SFX 330 Y 1
SFX 330 0 חו .
SFX 4066 Y 1
SFX 4066 0 חח .
SFX 299 Y 1
SFX 299 0 חי .
SFX 639 Y 1
SFX 639 0 נותיכם .
SFX 521 Y 1
SFX 521 0 חך .
SFX 638 Y 1
SFX 638 0 נותיכן .
SFX 1912 Y 1
SFX 1912 0 חל .
SFX 469 Y 1
SFX 469 0 חם .
SFX 513 Y 1
SFX 513 0 חן .
SFX 4930 Y 1
SFX 4930 0 חץ .
SFX 3168 Y 1
SFX 3168 0 חק .
SFX 3508 Y 1
SFX 3508 0 חר .
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 0 חת .
SFX 2036 Y 1
SFX 2036 0 יתונו .
SFX 2035 Y 1
SFX 2035 0 יתוני .
SFX 602 Y 1
SFX 602 0 וניהם .
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 0 וניהן .
SFX 814 Y 1
SFX 814 0 מהו .
SFX 3816 Y 1
SFX 3816 0 וקנה .
SFX 2507 Y 1
SFX 2507 0 וקנו .
SFX 3403 Y 1
SFX 3403 0 פסו .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 0 יטוה .
SFX 2824 Y 1
SFX 2824 0 יטוך .
SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 0 יטום .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 יטון .
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 0 יטות .
SFX 4796 Y 1
SFX 4796 0 כותי .
SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 0 ירהו .
SFX 1147 Y 1
SFX 1147 0 סטיות .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 ונה .
SFX 49 Y 1
SFX 49 0 ונו .
SFX 48 Y 1
SFX 48 0 וני .
SFX 433 Y 1
SFX 433 0 ונך .
SFX 430 Y 1
SFX 430 0 ונם .
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 0 ונן .
SFX 2338 Y 1
SFX 2338 0 ונת .
SFX 3331 Y 1
SFX 3331 0 ושיהם .
SFX 3330 Y 1
SFX 3330 0 ושיהן .
SFX 1093 Y 1
SFX 1093 0 חייך .
SFX 1001 Y 1
SFX 1001 0 רונו .
SFX 1000 Y 1
SFX 1000 0 רוני .
SFX 3625 Y 1
SFX 3625 0 פויותינו .
SFX 4071 Y 1
SFX 4071 0 וריות .
SFX 2674 Y 1
SFX 2674 0 לוגיות .
SFX 2073 Y 1
SFX 2073 0 יניכם .
SFX 2072 Y 1
SFX 2072 0 יניכן .
SFX 4294 Y 1
SFX 4294 0 נאי .
SFX 1402 Y 1
SFX 1402 0 צותינו .
SFX 1722 Y 1
SFX 1722 0 סותיה .
SFX 1719 Y 1
SFX 1719 0 סותיו .
SFX 1718 Y 1
SFX 1718 0 סותיי .
SFX 1716 Y 1
SFX 1716 0 סותיך .
SFX 3809 Y 1
SFX 3809 0 חלו .
SFX 3316 Y 1
SFX 3316 0 חלי .
SFX 4514 Y 1
SFX 4514 0 חלת .
SFX 35 Y 1
SFX 35 0 תה .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 תו .
SFX 3569 Y 1
SFX 3569 0 תח .
SFX 30 Y 1
SFX 30 0 תי .
SFX 40 Y 1
SFX 40 0 תך .
SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 תם .
SFX 28 Y 1
SFX 28 0 תן .
SFX 3774 Y 1
SFX 3774 0 יחתה .
SFX 3773 Y 1
SFX 3773 0 יחתו .
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 0 תק .
SFX 3772 Y 1
SFX 3772 0 יחתך .
SFX 2436 Y 1
SFX 2436 0 תר .
SFX 956 Y 1
SFX 956 0 תת .
SFX 3769 Y 1
SFX 3769 0 יחתם .
SFX 3768 Y 1
SFX 3768 0 יחתן .
SFX 436 Y 1
SFX 436 0 קכם .
SFX 435 Y 1
SFX 435 0 קכן .
SFX 3985 Y 1
SFX 3985 0 ישיכם .
SFX 3984 Y 1
SFX 3984 0 ישיכן .
SFX 1370 Y 1
SFX 1370 0 סיהם .
SFX 1369 Y 1
SFX 1369 0 סיהן .
SFX 1693 Y 1
SFX 1693 0 תותיכם .
SFX 1692 Y 1
SFX 1692 0 תותיכן .
SFX 4483 Y 1
SFX 4483 0 טתיכם .
SFX 4482 Y 1
SFX 4482 0 טתיכן .
SFX 769 Y 1
SFX 769 0 מיכם .
SFX 768 Y 1
SFX 768 0 מיכן .
SFX 3798 Y 1
SFX 3798 0 יגכם .
SFX 3797 Y 1
SFX 3797 0 יגכן .
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 ריה .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 ריו .
SFX 300 Y 1
SFX 300 0 ריי .
SFX 339 Y 1
SFX 339 0 ריך .
SFX 189 Y 1
SFX 189 0 רים .
SFX 1474 Y 1
SFX 1474 0 רין .
SFX 1089 Y 1
SFX 1089 0 רית .
SFX 2308 Y 1
SFX 2308 0 ילוהו .
SFX 1469 Y 1
SFX 1469 0 יטה .
SFX 1740 Y 1
SFX 1740 0 יטו .
SFX 1604 Y 1
SFX 1604 0 יטי .
SFX 1515 Y 1
SFX 1515 0 יטך .
SFX 1512 Y 1
SFX 1512 0 יטם .
SFX 1511 Y 1
SFX 1511 0 יטן .
SFX 1522 Y 1
SFX 1522 0 בוהו .
SFX 3759 Y 1
SFX 3759 0 יטת .
SFX 4611 Y 1
SFX 4611 0 ררים .
SFX 1908 Y 1
SFX 1908 0 ידיה .
SFX 3782 Y 1
SFX 3782 0 ידיו .
SFX 3491 Y 1
SFX 3491 0 ידיי .
SFX 3780 Y 1
SFX 3780 0 ידיך .
SFX 1726 Y 1
SFX 1726 0 ידים .
SFX 2987 Y 1
SFX 2987 0 ידין .
SFX 3217 Y 1
SFX 3217 0 שיות .
SFX 4209 Y 1
SFX 4209 0 קתיהו .
SFX 146 Y 1
SFX 146 0 תוה .
SFX 972 Y 1
SFX 972 0 קייך .
SFX 3376 Y 1
SFX 3376 0 קיים .
SFX 147 Y 1
SFX 147 0 תוך .
SFX 144 Y 1
SFX 144 0 תום .
SFX 143 Y 1
SFX 143 0 תון .
SFX 957 Y 1
SFX 957 0 תות .
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 0 בעי .
SFX 2671 Y 1
SFX 2671 0 לנוהו .
SFX 724 Y 1
SFX 724 0 פינו .
SFX 2533 Y 1
SFX 2533 0 פיני .
SFX 1393 Y 1
SFX 1393 0 כהו .
SFX 3011 Y 1
SFX 3011 0 ופנו .
SFX 3510 Y 1
SFX 3510 0 חוכם .
SFX 3509 Y 1
SFX 3509 0 חוכן .
SFX 2160 Y 1
SFX 2160 0 רתוה .
SFX 2158 Y 1
SFX 2158 0 רתוך .
SFX 2157 Y 1
SFX 2157 0 רתום .
SFX 2156 Y 1
SFX 2156 0 רתון .
SFX 718 Y 1
SFX 718 0 ניתה .
SFX 717 Y 1
SFX 717 0 ניתו .
SFX 708 Y 1
SFX 708 0 ניתי .
SFX 716 Y 1
SFX 716 0 ניתך .
SFX 707 Y 1
SFX 707 0 ניתם .
SFX 706 Y 1
SFX 706 0 ניתן .
SFX 2934 Y 1
SFX 2934 0 מויותיה .
SFX 2931 Y 1
SFX 2931 0 מויותיו .
SFX 2930 Y 1
SFX 2930 0 מויותיי .
SFX 2928 Y 1
SFX 2928 0 מויותיך .
SFX 1070 Y 1
SFX 1070 0 שותיהם .
SFX 1069 Y 1
SFX 1069 0 שותיהן .
SFX 874 Y 1
SFX 874 0 גנה .
SFX 619 Y 1
SFX 619 0 גנו .
SFX 1418 Y 1
SFX 1418 0 גני .
SFX 1281 Y 1
SFX 1281 0 טותיכם .
SFX 1280 Y 1
SFX 1280 0 טותיכן .
SFX 1246 Y 1
SFX 1246 0 נויותייך .
SFX 1646 Y 1
SFX 1646 0 ילנה .
SFX 1026 Y 1
SFX 1026 0 ילנו .
SFX 1739 Y 1
SFX 1739 0 ילני .
SFX 4987 Y 1
SFX 4987 0 וגיכם .
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 0 וגיכן .
SFX 3209 Y 1
SFX 3209 0 אותה .
SFX 3208 Y 1
SFX 3208 0 אותו .
SFX 3207 Y 1
SFX 3207 0 אותי .
SFX 3206 Y 1
SFX 3206 0 אותך .
SFX 3203 Y 1
SFX 3203 0 אותם .
SFX 3202 Y 1
SFX 3202 0 אותן .
SFX 1822 Y 1
SFX 1822 0 זציה .
SFX 935 Y 1
SFX 935 0 שתה .
SFX 910 Y 1
SFX 910 0 שתו .
SFX 1826 Y 1
SFX 1826 0 בב .
SFX 781 Y 1
SFX 781 0 שתי .
SFX 934 Y 1
SFX 934 0 שתך .
SFX 3068 Y 1
SFX 3068 0 בד .
SFX 256 Y 1
SFX 256 0 בה .
SFX 273 Y 1
SFX 273 0 בו .
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 0 שתם .
SFX 622 Y 1
SFX 622 0 שתן .
SFX 3200 Y 1
SFX 3200 0 בט .
SFX 260 Y 1
SFX 260 0 בי .
SFX 400 Y 1
SFX 400 0 בך .
SFX 1582 Y 1
SFX 1582 0 בל .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 בם .
SFX 334 Y 1
SFX 334 0 בן .
SFX 2345 Y 1
SFX 2345 0 בע .
SFX 924 Y 1
SFX 924 0 דותיה .
SFX 3353 Y 1
SFX 3353 0 בק .
SFX 921 Y 1
SFX 921 0 דותיו .
SFX 1472 Y 1
SFX 1472 0 בר .
SFX 3066 Y 1
SFX 3066 0 בש .
SFX 327 Y 1
SFX 327 0 בת .
SFX 906 Y 1
SFX 906 0 דותיי .
SFX 919 Y 1
SFX 919 0 דותיך .
SFX 3037 Y 1
SFX 3037 0 ומיהם .
SFX 3036 Y 1
SFX 3036 0 ומיהן .
SFX 4546 Y 1
SFX 4546 0 וחכם .
SFX 4545 Y 1
SFX 4545 0 וחכן .
SFX 3477 Y 1
SFX 3477 0 יטיהו .
SFX 3764 Y 1
SFX 3764 0 יטיהם .
SFX 3763 Y 1
SFX 3763 0 יטיהן .
SFX 2887 Y 1
SFX 2887 0 ריותיכם .
SFX 2886 Y 1
SFX 2886 0 ריותיכן .
SFX 920 Y 1
SFX 920 0 דותייך .
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 0 פכם .
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 0 פכן .
SFX 1618 Y 1
SFX 1618 0 ונותיה .
SFX 1615 Y 1
SFX 1615 0 ונותיו .
SFX 1614 Y 1
SFX 1614 0 ונותיי .
SFX 1612 Y 1
SFX 1612 0 ונותיך .
SFX 3342 Y 1
SFX 3342 0 וטיה .
SFX 3542 Y 1
SFX 3542 0 וטיו .
SFX 2728 Y 1
SFX 2728 0 וטיי .
SFX 3540 Y 1
SFX 3540 0 וטיך .
SFX 2857 Y 1
SFX 2857 0 וטים .
SFX 783 Y 1
SFX 783 0 מותינו .
SFX 4143 Y 1
SFX 4143 0 דויותיכם .
SFX 4142 Y 1
SFX 4142 0 דויותיכן .
SFX 968 Y 1
SFX 968 0 חותיהם .
SFX 967 Y 1
SFX 967 0 חותיהן .
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 0 תוהו .
SFX 2819 Y 1
SFX 2819 0 ימיכם .
SFX 2818 Y 1
SFX 2818 0 ימיכן .
SFX 3004 Y 1
SFX 3004 0 זיהם .
SFX 3003 Y 1
SFX 3003 0 זיהן .
SFX 2074 Y 1
SFX 2074 0 יניות .
SFX 3021 Y 1
SFX 3021 0 ופייך .
SFX 2529 Y 1
SFX 2529 0 קוכם .
SFX 2528 Y 1
SFX 2528 0 קוכן .
SFX 858 Y 1
SFX 858 0 דיכם .
SFX 857 Y 1
SFX 857 0 דיכן .
SFX 2503 Y 1
SFX 2503 0 יבוהו .
SFX 4515 Y 1
SFX 4515 0 חזר .
SFX 2535 Y 1
SFX 2535 0 פד .
SFX 258 Y 1
SFX 258 0 פה .
SFX 313 Y 1
SFX 313 0 פו .
SFX 2774 Y 1
SFX 2774 0 פח .
SFX 277 Y 1
SFX 277 0 פי .
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 פך .
SFX 1925 Y 1
SFX 1925 0 פל .
SFX 2566 Y 1
SFX 2566 0 ירותיהם .
SFX 476 Y 1
SFX 476 0 פם .
SFX 2565 Y 1
SFX 2565 0 ירותיהן .
SFX 447 Y 1
SFX 447 0 פן .
SFX 1951 Y 1
SFX 1951 0 פס .
SFX 1385 Y 1
SFX 1385 0 פף .
SFX 2772 Y 1
SFX 2772 0 פק .
SFX 1832 Y 1
SFX 1832 0 פר .
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 פת .
SFX 1565 Y 1
SFX 1565 0 קוה .
SFX 1585 Y 1
SFX 1585 0 קוך .
SFX 1549 Y 1
SFX 1549 0 קום .
SFX 1461 Y 1
SFX 1461 0 קון .
SFX 326 Y 1
SFX 326 0 קות .
SFX 1862 Y 1
SFX 1862 0 גתכם .
SFX 1861 Y 1
SFX 1861 0 גתכן .
SFX 1189 Y 1
SFX 1189 0 טהו .
SFX 3818 Y 1
SFX 3818 0 וניותינו .
SFX 2097 Y 1
SFX 2097 0 מיות .
SFX 1769 Y 1
SFX 1769 0 יעהו .
SFX 2482 Y 1
SFX 2482 0 יפינו .
SFX 567 Y 1
SFX 567 0 לייך .
SFX 1723 Y 1
SFX 1723 0 ליים .
SFX 3301 Y 1
SFX 3301 0 יגה .
SFX 4046 Y 1
SFX 4046 0 יגו .
SFX 2989 Y 1
SFX 2989 0 יגי .
SFX 3799 Y 1
SFX 3799 0 יגך .
SFX 3796 Y 1
SFX 3796 0 יגם .
SFX 3503 Y 1
SFX 3503 0 יגן .
SFX 1060 Y 1
SFX 1060 0 יינו .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 0 רותינו .
SFX 3583 Y 1
SFX 3583 0 שותה .
SFX 3582 Y 1
SFX 3582 0 שותו .
SFX 3581 Y 1
SFX 3581 0 שותי .
SFX 3580 Y 1
SFX 3580 0 שותך .
SFX 3577 Y 1
SFX 3577 0 שותם .
SFX 3576 Y 1
SFX 3576 0 שותן .
SFX 3840 Y 1
SFX 3840 0 ויתי .
SFX 3839 Y 1
SFX 3839 0 ויתם .
SFX 3838 Y 1
SFX 3838 0 ויתן .
SFX 1322 Y 1
SFX 1322 0 צתה .
SFX 1337 Y 1
SFX 1337 0 צתו .
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 0 צתי .
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 0 צתך .
SFX 4591 Y 1
SFX 4591 0 בלים .
SFX 1036 Y 1
SFX 1036 0 צתם .
SFX 1035 Y 1
SFX 1035 0 צתן .
SFX 1126 Y 1
SFX 1126 0 טתנו .
SFX 1838 Y 1
SFX 1838 0 טתני .
SFX 3556 Y 1
SFX 3556 0 בלו .
SFX 2865 Y 1
SFX 2865 0 בלי .
SFX 861 Y 1
SFX 861 0 עינו .
SFX 3199 Y 1
SFX 3199 0 בלת .
SFX 1953 Y 1
SFX 1953 0 עיני .
SFX 3153 Y 1
SFX 3153 0 יבתה .
SFX 3152 Y 1
SFX 3152 0 יבתו .
SFX 3151 Y 1
SFX 3151 0 יבתך .
SFX 2991 Y 1
SFX 2991 0 יבתם .
SFX 2990 Y 1
SFX 2990 0 יבתן .
SFX 864 Y 1
SFX 864 0 סכם .
SFX 863 Y 1
SFX 863 0 סכן .
SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 0 ונותיכם .
SFX 1610 Y 1
SFX 1610 0 ונותיכן .
SFX 4102 Y 1
SFX 4102 0 ודיהם .
SFX 4101 Y 1
SFX 4101 0 ודיהן .
SFX 862 Y 1
SFX 862 0 עיה .
SFX 1262 Y 1
SFX 1262 0 עיו .
SFX 1181 Y 1
SFX 1181 0 עיי .
SFX 1260 Y 1
SFX 1260 0 עיך .
SFX 466 Y 1
SFX 466 0 עים .
SFX 1954 Y 1
SFX 1954 0 עין .
SFX 2863 Y 1
SFX 2863 0 גונו .
SFX 3197 Y 1
SFX 3197 0 גוני .
SFX 4261 Y 1
SFX 4261 0 עית .
SFX 830 Y 1
SFX 830 0 קותיכם .
SFX 829 Y 1
SFX 829 0 קותיכן .
SFX 2113 Y 1
SFX 2113 0 זותינו .
SFX 2040 Y 1
SFX 2040 0 יתוהו .
SFX 933 Y 1
SFX 933 0 בותיה .
SFX 932 Y 1
SFX 932 0 בותיו .
SFX 952 Y 1
SFX 952 0 בותיי .
SFX 931 Y 1
SFX 931 0 בותיך .
SFX 3282 Y 1
SFX 3282 0 ילותייך .
SFX 2404 Y 1
SFX 2404 0 ידיכם .
SFX 2403 Y 1
SFX 2403 0 ידיכן .
SFX 1976 Y 1
SFX 1976 0 פוה .
SFX 1952 Y 1
SFX 1952 0 פוך .
SFX 1974 Y 1
SFX 1974 0 פום .
SFX 1736 Y 1
SFX 1736 0 פון .
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 פות .
SFX 2193 Y 1
SFX 2193 0 לוכם .
SFX 2192 Y 1
SFX 2192 0 לוכן .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 והו .
SFX 4967 Y 1
SFX 4967 0 ומנה .
SFX 2842 Y 1
SFX 2842 0 ומנו .
SFX 4446 Y 1
SFX 4446 0 יוננו .
SFX 1144 Y 1
SFX 1144 0 רוהו .
SFX 4416 Y 1
SFX 4416 0 ינותה .
SFX 4415 Y 1
SFX 4415 0 ינותו .
SFX 4414 Y 1
SFX 4414 0 ינותי .
SFX 4413 Y 1
SFX 4413 0 ינותך .
SFX 4410 Y 1
SFX 4410 0 ינותם .
SFX 4409 Y 1
SFX 4409 0 ינותן .
SFX 3633 Y 1
SFX 3633 0 פויותיהם .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 פויותיהן .
SFX 1410 Y 1
SFX 1410 0 צותיהם .
SFX 1409 Y 1
SFX 1409 0 צותיהן .
SFX 4507 Y 1
SFX 4507 0 טנוה .
SFX 4505 Y 1
SFX 4505 0 טנוך .
SFX 4502 Y 1
SFX 4502 0 טנום .
SFX 4501 Y 1
SFX 4501 0 טנון .
SFX 2578 Y 1
SFX 2578 0 ילייך .
SFX 2605 Y 1
SFX 2605 0 דיות .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 בייך .
SFX 2270 Y 1
SFX 2270 0 ביים .
SFX 3437 Y 1
SFX 3437 0 מא .
SFX 2370 Y 1
SFX 2370 0 מד .
SFX 236 Y 1
SFX 236 0 מה .
SFX 265 Y 1
SFX 265 0 מו .
SFX 2632 Y 1
SFX 2632 0 מט .
SFX 257 Y 1
SFX 257 0 מי .
SFX 383 Y 1
SFX 383 0 מך .
SFX 3686 Y 1
SFX 3686 0 מל .
SFX 319 Y 1
SFX 319 0 מם .
SFX 329 Y 1
SFX 329 0 מן .
SFX 1500 Y 1
SFX 1500 0 מר .
SFX 2228 Y 1
SFX 2228 0 מש .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 מת .
SFX 594 Y 1
SFX 594 0 וניכם .
SFX 593 Y 1
SFX 593 0 וניכן .
SFX 4557 Y 1
SFX 4557 0 ובכם .
SFX 4556 Y 1
SFX 4556 0 ובכן .
SFX 2641 Y 1
SFX 2641 0 מותה .
SFX 2640 Y 1
SFX 2640 0 מותו .
SFX 2639 Y 1
SFX 2639 0 מותי .
SFX 2638 Y 1
SFX 2638 0 מותך .
SFX 2635 Y 1
SFX 2635 0 מותם .
SFX 2634 Y 1
SFX 2634 0 מותן .
SFX 398 Y 1
SFX 398 0 מכם .
SFX 397 Y 1
SFX 397 0 מכן .
SFX 3611 Y 1
SFX 3611 0 פרו .
SFX 2900 Y 1
SFX 2900 0 פרי .
SFX 3894 Y 1
SFX 3894 0 פרת .
SFX 2973 Y 1
SFX 2973 0 יטתנו .
SFX 2972 Y 1
SFX 2972 0 יטתני .
SFX 3194 Y 1
SFX 3194 0 וגיה .
SFX 4990 Y 1
SFX 4990 0 וגיו .
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 0 וגיי .
SFX 4988 Y 1
SFX 4988 0 וגיך .
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 0 וגים .
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 0 ירכם .
SFX 982 Y 1
SFX 982 0 ירכן .
SFX 2723 Y 1
SFX 2723 0 וקה .
SFX 2722 Y 1
SFX 2722 0 וקו .
